Wyoming, session 2026, SF0024.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-17-108(a)(ii) is amended to read:
9-17-108. Adoption by board of procedures regulating
conduct of lottery games.
(a) The board may adopt regulations, policies and
procedures regulating the conduct of lottery games in
general, including, but not limited to, regulations,
policies and procedures specifying:
(ii) The sale price of tickets or shares and the
manner of sale, provided, however, that all sales shall be
for cash or debit cards only and payment by checks, debit
cards, credit cards, charge cards or any other form of
payment is prohibited;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0024
ENROLLED ACT NO. 6, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2